Maryland, session 2025, SB0086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–11.
(b) (1) For online sports wagering, a mobile sports wagering licensee shall:
[(1)] (I) have in place technical and operational measures to prevent
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0086*

SENATE BILL 86
access by individuals who are underage or physically located outside the State, including:
[(i)] 1. age verification procedures, which may require the use of
a reputable independent third party that is in the business of verifying an individual’s
personally identifiable information; and
[(ii)] 2. the use of geolocation technology to verify a bettor’s
geographic location;
[(2)] (II) include on its online sports wagering website a description of the
possible repercussions for an underage or out–of–state bettor, which may include
immediate stoppage of play, account closure, and forfeiture and confiscation of winnings;
[and]
[(3)] (III) PUBLISH PROMINENTLY ON THE HOMEPAGE LANDING PAGE
OF ITS ONLINE SPORTS WAGERING WEBSITE AND MOBILE APPLICATION THE
STATEMENT “IF YOU OR SOMEONE YOU KNOW HAS A GAMBLING PROBLEM, CLICK
HERE OR CALL 1–800–GAMBLER FOR HELP”, OR OTHER COMPARABLE LANGUAGE
APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION; AND
(IV) establish procedures to prevent prohibited individuals from
wagering on sporting events.
(2) THE WORDS “CLICK HERE” REQUIRED TO BE PUBLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL CONTAIN A LINK TO THE WEBSITE
OF THE MARYLAND CENTER OF EXCELLENCE ON PROBLEM GAMBLING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.